Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Methods of Voting
117.235.
Persons permitted in voting room — Electioneering and prohibited activities — Maintenance of order — Mock elections for school children — Display of political campaign signs on private property.

No person, other than the election officers, challengers, person assisting voters in accordance with KRS 117.255(3), and a minor child in the company of a voter, shall be permitted within the voting room while the vote is being polled, except as follows:

For the purpose of voting;

By authority of the election officers to keep order and enforce the law;

With the express approval of the county board of elections to repair or replace voting equipment that is malfunctioning, and to provide additional voting equipment; or

At the voter’s discretion, a minor child in the company of a voter may accompany the voter into a voting booth or other private area provided for casting a vote.

No officer of election shall do any electioneering on election day.

No person shall electioneer at the polling place on the day of any election, as established in KRS

118.025

, or within a distance of one hundred (100) feet of any entrance to a building in which voting is conducted if that entrance is unlocked and is used by voters on any primary or election day.

No person shall electioneer within the interior of a building or affix any electioneering materials to the exterior or interior of a building where the county clerk’s office is located, or any building designated by the county board of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections for in-person absentee voting, during the hours in-person absentee voting is being conducted in the building.

No person shall electioneer within one hundred (100) feet of a mail-in absentee drop-box or drop-receptacle.

Electioneering shall include the displaying of signs, the distribution of campaign literature, cards, or handbills, the soliciting of signatures to any petition, or the solicitation of votes for or against any bona fide candidate or ballot question in a manner which expressly advocates the election or defeat of the candidate or expressly advocates the passage or defeat of the ballot question, but shall not include exit polling, bumper stickers affixed to a person’s vehicle while parked within or passing through a distance of one hundred (100) feet of any entrance to a building in which voting is conducted, private property as provided in subsection (7) of this section, or other exceptions established by the State Board of Elections through the promulgation of administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A.

No voter shall be permitted to converse with others while in any room in which voting, including in-person absentee voting, is conducted concerning their support or nonsupport of any candidate, party, or issue to be voted on, except as provided in KRS

117.255

.

Any precinct election officer, county clerk, deputy county clerk, or any law enforcement official may enforce the election laws and maintain law and order at the polls and within one hundred (100) feet of any entrance to the building in which voting is conducted if that entrance is unlocked and is used by voters. Assistance may be requested of any law enforcement officer.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the State Board of Elections may establish a program designed to instill in school children a respect for the democratic principles of voting by conducting in any county a mock election for school children in conjunction with any primary, regular, or special election. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A regarding the mock elections to ensure that the regular voting process will not be impaired.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, nothing in this section shall prohibit the displaying of political campaign signs on private property or private establishments by a person having a leased or ownership interest in that private property or private establishment within the campaign-free zone, regardless of the distance from the polling place. In the case of a polling location being on private property that is leased or otherwise under contract for the purpose of serving as a polling location, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall be applicable to that leased or contracted-for private property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 37; 1978, ch. 224, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 318, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 470, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 30, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 27, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 22, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 49, § 1, effective March 12, 1996; 1996, ch. 195, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 176, § 1, effective March 31, 2005; 2006, ch. 107, § 3, effective March 30, 2006; 2008, ch. 79, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2016 ch. 62, § 4, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 197, § 29, effective June 29, 2021.

117.236.
Prohibition against recording identity of voters — Exception, state-approved signature roster.

For purposes of this section, “personal telecommunication device” means a device that emits an audible signal, vibrates, displays a message, or otherwise summons or delivers a communication to the possessor, including but not limited to a paging device or cellular telephone.

No election officer, voter, or other person permitted by law within the voting room, except for challengers appointed under KRS

117.315

, shall use paper, telephone, a personal telecommunications device, or a computer or other information technology system for the purpose of creating a checkoff list or otherwise recording the identity of voters within the voting room, except for the official use of the precinct signature roster that is furnished or approved by the State Board of Elections and is otherwise permitted by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 71, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

117.237.
Request for Department of Kentucky State Police to patrol voting precinct during polling hours and investigate reported violations — Reports to prosecutors.

A county board of elections, a clerk, judge/executive, sheriff, fiscal court, the Attorney General, grand jury, or the county chairman of either of the two (2) political parties which polled the largest vote in the preceding general election may request that the Department of Kentucky State Police patrol voting precincts in the county during the hours the polls are open on the day of any primary or regular or special election for the purpose of maintaining order and enforcing the election laws of the state. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall investigate any reported violations of the election laws. Candidates may petition any of the aforementioned officers or bodies to request State Police patrols of county voting precincts.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall report the results of their investigation to the appropriate Commonwealth’s and county attorneys.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 31, effective July 15, 1988; 2007, ch. 85, § 159, effective June 26, 2007.

117.245.
Procedure when voter’s right to vote disputed.

The fact that a person is registered constitutes only prima facie evidence of his or her right to vote and does not prevent the officers of any election from refusing to allow him or her to vote for cause.

When the officers of an election disagree as to the qualifications of a voter or if his or her right to vote is disputed by a challenger, other than for failure to provide proof of identification as defined in KRS

117.001

, the voter shall sign a written oath as to his or her qualifications before he or she is permitted to vote. The oath shall be in such form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A. Twenty (20) printed copies of these oaths shall be included in the election supplies of each precinct.

The subscribed oaths shall be returned to the county clerk who shall deliver them to the Commonwealth’s attorney.

The Commonwealth’s attorney and county attorney shall investigate each of the oaths and cause to be summoned before the grand jury the witnesses they or either of them, deem proper, and the grand jury shall make a thorough investigation of all votes so cast, and return indictments against all persons illegally voting. The foreman of the grand jury shall return to the county clerk all of the oaths upon which no indictments are found. The county clerk shall safely keep them as a part of the records of his or her office, and shall produce any or all of them, when required, to any subsequent grand jury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 38; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 130, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 2020 ch. 89, § 17, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 33, effective June 29, 2021.

117.255.
Instruction of voters — Voters requiring assistance — Manner of voting — Report of violations.

The voter shall be instructed by the officers of election, with the aid of the instruction cards and any model if applicable, in the use of the voting equipment, if the voter so requests.

Except for those voters who have been certified as requiring assistance on a permanent basis under this section, no voter shall be permitted to receive any assistance in voting at the polls unless the voter makes and signs an oath that, because of blindness, other physical disability, or an inability to read English, the voter is unable to vote without assistance. The voter shall indicate in the oath the specific reason that requires the voter to receive assistance. The oath shall be upon a voter assistance form prescribed and furnished by the State Board of Elections pursuant to administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A. Any person assisting a voter shall complete the voter assistance form.

Upon making and filing the oath with the precinct clerk, the voter requiring assistance shall retire to the voting booth or ballot completion area with the precinct judges, and one (1) of the judges shall, in the presence of the other judge and the voter, complete the ballot as the voter directs. A voter requiring assistance in voting may, if the voter prefers, be assisted by a person of the voter’s own choice who is not an election officer, except that the voter’s employer, an agent of the voter’s employer, or an officer or agent of the voter’s union shall not assist a voter.

The precinct election clerk shall swear a person assisting a voter in voting to complete the ballot in accordance with the directions of the voter, and the person sworn shall enter the voting booth or ballot completion area and complete the ballot for the voter as the voter directs.

A voter who requires voting assistance on a permanent basis because of blindness or other physical disability may apply to the county board of elections for certification. Application may be made when registering to vote or completing the voter assistance form by indicating that the reason for obtaining assistance is permanent. The county board of elections shall determine whether the applicant requires assistance on a permanent basis. The county board of elections shall notify the county clerk of persons certified as requiring permanent voting assistance and the county clerk shall enter the certification on the voter’s registration record. The State Board of Elections shall indicate on the precinct roster of voters those voters who are certified to receive assistance permanently without signing the voter assistance form at the precinct.

No voter shall be permitted to occupy the voting booth or ballot completion area more than four (4) minutes if other voters are waiting to use it, except that those voters who because of a disability need extra time to cast a ballot shall be given a reasonable amount of time to vote.

In primaries, before a voter is permitted to use the voting equipment, a judge of the election shall adjust the voting equipment so that the voter will only be able to vote for the persons for whom the voter is qualified to vote.

If the voting equipment is so constructed as to require adjustment after one (1) person has voted before another person may vote, the judges of election shall adjust it after each person has voted.

The election officers shall constantly maintain a watch in order to prevent any person from voting more than once.

For voters voting as federal provisional voters, or if supplemental paper ballots have been approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, the voter shall vote his or her federal provisional or supplemental ballot in privacy in a voting booth provided for that purpose by the county clerk. If the voter spoils his or her federal provisional or supplemental ballot, the voter shall return the spoiled federal provisional or supplemental paper ballot to an election officer who shall stamp the ballot “Spoiled,” initial, and place the spoiled federal provisional or supplemental ballot in an envelope provided for that purpose. The voter shall be issued a second federal provisional or supplemental paper ballot. Upon completion of voting, the voter shall remove the numbered stub from the federal provisional or supplemental ballot, hand the stub to an election officer and deposit the voted federal provisional or supplemental ballot in the appropriate locked ballot box or locked receptacle in the presence of an election officer.

The election sheriff shall be responsible for reporting violations of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 39; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 8; 1982, ch. 360, § 40, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 287, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 470, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 32, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 394, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 405, § 15, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 243, § 11, effective April 1, 1998; 2007, ch. 133, § 1, effective April 5, 2007; 2020 ch. 89, § 18, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 34, effective June 29, 2021.

117.265.
Write-in votes — Requirements — Persons ineligible to be write-in candidate — Certified lists of qualified candidates.

A voter may, at any regular or special election, cast a write-in vote for any person qualified as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, whose name does not appear upon the ballot for any office, by writing the name of his or her choice upon the appropriate ballot for the office being voted on as required by KRS

117.125

. Any candidate for city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified local government office who is defeated in a partisan or nonpartisan primary shall be ineligible as a candidate for the same office in the regular election. Any voter utilizing a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional in-person absentee ballot, or a mail-in absentee ballot for a regular or special election may write in a vote for any eligible person whose name does not appear upon the ballot, by writing the name of his or her choice under the office.

Write-in votes shall be counted only for candidates for election to office who have filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate with the Secretary of State or county clerk, depending on the office being sought, on or before the fourth Friday in October preceding the date of the regular election and not later than the second Friday before the date of a special election. In the case of a special election administered under KRS

118.730

, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate shall be filed at least twenty-eight (28) days before the day of the election. The declaration of intent shall be filed no earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot, and no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which papers may be filed. The declaration of intent shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State.

A person shall not be eligible as a write-in candidate:

For more than one (1) office in a regular or special election; or

If his or her name appears upon the ballot for any office, except that the candidate may file a notice of withdrawal prior to filing an intent to be a write-in candidate for office when a vacancy in a different office occurs because of:

Death;

Disqualification to hold the office sought;

Severe disabling condition which arose after the nomination; or

The nomination of an unopposed candidate.

Persons who wish to run for President and Vice-President shall file a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, along with a list of presidential electors pledged to those candidates, with the Secretary of State on or before the fourth Friday in October preceding the date of the regular election for those offices. The declaration of intent shall be filed no earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year the office will appear on the ballot, and no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which papers may be filed. Write-in votes cast for the candidates whose names appear on the ballot shall apply to the slate of pledged presidential electors, whose names shall not appear on the ballot.

The county clerk shall provide to the precinct election officers certified lists of those persons who have filed declarations of intent as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. Only write-in votes cast for qualified candidates shall be counted.

Two (2) election officers of opposing parties shall upon the request of any voter instruct the voter on how to cast a write-in vote.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 40; 1976, ch. 247, § 6; 1982, ch. 394, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 287, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 366, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 57, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 454, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 243, § 12, effective April 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 34, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 71, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 79, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 8, § 1, effective March 28, 2012; 2015 ch. 70, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2020 ch. 89, § 19, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 35, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/28/2012).
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 5, provides that the amendments to this statute in 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8 shall be cited as “The Dewayne Bunch Act.”

(7/14/92) This section was amended
by 1992 Acts chs. 288 and 454 which are in conflict. Pursuant to KRS

446.250

,
Acts ch. 288 which was last enacted by the General Assembly prevails.

117.275.
Counting and certification of votes — Locking and sealing of equipment — Return sheets — Transmission of records — Return of keys and equipment — Return of ballot boxes, federal provisional ballot receptacle, supplemental paper ballot box, ballot stubs, spoiled, and unvoted ballots — Authorized representatives of candidates and news media to witness vote count — Tabulation and certification of ballots and distribution of precinct-by-precinct summary of results — Limitation on publicizing partial results — Online transmission of unofficial results — Retention schedule for documents.

At the count of the votes in any precinct, any candidate or slate of candidates and any representatives to witness and check the count of the votes therein, who are authorized to be appointed as is provided in subsection (9) of this section, shall be admitted and permitted to be present and witness the count.

As soon as the polls are closed, and the last voter has voted, the judges at that time shall immediately lock and seal the voting equipment so that the voting and counting mechanisms will be prevented from operating, and they shall sign a certificate stating:

That the voting equipment has been locked against voting and sealed;

The number of voters, as shown on the public counters;

The number registered on the protective or cumulative counter or device; and

The number or other designation of the voting equipment.

The certificate, with any additional certificate previously prepared under KRS

117.035

, shall be returned by the judges of election to the officials authorized by law to receive it. The judges shall compare the number of voters, as shown by the counter of the voting equipment, with the number of those who have voted as shown by the protective or cumulative counter or device.

Where voting equipment is used which does not print the candidates’ names along with the total votes received on a general return sheet or record for that equipment, the procedure to be followed shall be as follows:

The judges, in the presence of the representatives mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, if any, and of all other persons who may be lawfully within the polling place, shall give full view of all the counter numbers;

The judges shall enter, in ink, the total votes cast for each candidate, and slate of candidates, and for and against each question on the return sheets; and

Each precinct election officer shall sign the return sheets, and a copy of the return sheets shall be posted on the precinct door.

Where voting equipment is used that prints the candidates’ names along with the total votes received on a return sheet or record for that equipment, the precinct election officers shall sign the return sheets or record for the voting equipment, which shall be posted on the door of the precinct.

If any officer shall decline to sign the return sheets, he or she shall state the reason in writing, and a copy thereof, signed by the officer, shall be enclosed with the return sheets.

Each of the return sheets, if applicable, and the record of the voting equipment shall be enclosed in an envelope. One (1) copy of the return sheets, if applicable, one (1) copy of the record of the voting equipment, and the write-in roll, if any write-in votes were cast in the precinct, shall be directed to the county board of elections of the county in which the election is being held. One (1) copy of the return sheets or record of the voting equipment shall be given to the county clerk of the county in which the election is being held and to each of the local governing bodies of the two (2) dominant political parties, but a local governing body of a dominant political party may decline a copy of the precinct election return by filing a written declination with the county board of elections prior to the election, and upon this declination, a printed copy shall not be issued to the political party so declining. The declination on file shall be effective for that election and any subsequent elections until revoked by the local governing body of a dominant political party by filing a written revocation with the county board of elections. The envelope shall have endorsed thereon a certificate of the election officers, stating the number or unique designation of the voting equipment, the precinct where it has been used, the number on the seal, and the number on the protective or cumulative counter or device at the close of the polls.

During the period established by KRS 117.355(3), and following the tabulation of all votes cast in the election, including absentee votes and write-in votes:

The county board of elections shall mail, transmit via facsimile machine, hand-deliver, or submit by electronic means a copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct to the State Board of Elections. The copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct shall include the votes cast on the day of an election and during in-person absentee voting; and

The county clerk shall mail or deliver the precinct signature rosters from each precinct and the in-person absentee ballot signature roster to the State Board of Elections.

For each voting location, as soon as possible after the completion of the count, the two (2) election officers who are not of the same political affiliation shall return to the county board of elections the keys to the voting equipment received and receipted for by them, and the county clerk, in each voting location, shall have the voting equipment properly boxed or securely covered and removed to a proper and secure place of storage.

In primaries, each candidate or group of candidates may designate to the county board of elections a representative to witness and check the vote count. In regular elections, the governing authority of each political party, each candidate for member of board of education, nonpartisan candidate, political group candidate, political organization candidate, independent candidate, or independent ticket may designate a representative to the county board of elections to witness and check the vote count. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to witness the vote count.

For all federal provisional ballots, if applicable, and supplemental paper ballots if approved as provided in KRS

118.215

, after the polls are closed, the two (2) judges shall return to the county clerk’s office the locked federal provisional ballot receptacle and the supplemental paper ballot box, all ballot stubs, spoiled ballots, and unvoted ballots at the same time as the tabulation of votes from the voting equipment is delivered. The county clerk shall issue a receipt for the number of ballot stubs, unvoted ballots, spoiled ballots, and the ballot boxes or ballot receptacle.

The county board of elections, or its designee, shall count and tally the supplemental paper ballots that have not been tabulated by automatic tabulating equipment at the precinct, either manually or with the use of tabulating equipment that has been certified by the State Board of Elections for use for that purpose in the county clerk’s office. The results of the vote tally shall be certified by the county board of elections to the county clerk and to the Secretary of State.

The county board of elections shall tabulate the valid federal provisional ballots. The results of the vote tally shall be certified by the county board of elections to the county clerk and to the Secretary of State. The county board of elections shall mail a copy of the precinct-by-precinct summary of the valid federal provisional ballot tabulation sheets showing the results from each precinct to the State Board of Elections.

The county board of elections shall authorize the candidates, slates of candidates, or their representatives, and representatives of the news media to be present during the counting of the supplemental and federal provisional paper ballots.

No person shall transmit or publicize any tallies or counts of ballots, or any partial results, to any person except those persons, election officials, or entities authorized by law to receive it, until 6 p.m. prevailing time on the day of a primary or an election.

Unofficial election results transmitted online to the county board of elections or the State Board of Elections shall occur by means of a secure online connection after results are tallied on the tally computer that has been certified in accordance with KRS

117.379

as part of a voting system as defined in KRS

117.001

.

If an external device is used to upload election results for the subsequent transmission, the device shall be used for that primary or election only and be of a type approved by the State Board of Elections as part of a voting system under KRS

117.379

. The upload of the election results shall occur in the presence of two (2) members of the county board of elections who are of a different political affiliation.

Except as otherwise required in this chapter, all records and papers relating to specified elections shall be retained for twenty-two (22) months, and the county clerk shall retain the voted federal provisional ballots, voter affirmations, election official affirmations, and the supplemental paper ballots for twenty-two (22) months and the unvoted federal provisional ballots, the voter affirmations, election official affirmations, and the supplemental paper ballots for sixty (60) days after each election day, after which time they shall be destroyed in a manner to render them unreadable by the county board of elections if no contest or recount action has been filed.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 41; 1976, ch. 130, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 9; 1978, ch. 384, § 249, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 470, § 15, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 30, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 36, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 79, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2008, ch. 129, § 4, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 88, § 4, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 89, § 20, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 36, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 16, effective April 7, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). A reference to “subsection (7)” in subsection (1) of this statute has been changed in codification to “subsection (6).”
2008 Ky. Acts ch. 129, sec. 4, deleted a subsection from this statute, resulting in the renumbering of subsequent subsections, but did not make the necessary change to the internal reference in subsection (1). This oversight has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1).

(7/15/2008). This section was amended by 2008 Ky. Acts chs. 79 and 129, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 129, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

117.285.
Form
of return sheets and statement — Delivery. [Repealed.]

117.295.
Period during which voting equipment is to remain locked — Video surveillance — Examination — Custody of keys.

For a period of thirty (30) days following any election, the voting equipment shall remain locked against voting, the ballot boxes containing all paper ballots shall remain locked, and the voting equipment and ballot boxes shall be under video surveillance. The system used to conduct the video surveillance shall have enough storage capacity to retain sixty (60) consecutive days of continuous recording data. The voting equipment and the ballot boxes may be opened and all the data and figures therein examined:

Upon the order of any court of competent jurisdiction, or judge thereof;

By direction of any legislative committee or board authorized and empowered to investigate and report upon contested elections;

By a county board of elections under the direction of the State Board of Elections pursuant to a risk-limiting audit; or

As required to conduct a recount under KRS

120.157

.

All the data and figures shall be examined by the court, judge, county board of elections, State Board of Elections, or committee in the presence of the officer having the custody of the voting equipment, ballots, and ballot boxes. In the event of a contest of election, the court in which the contest is pending or the committee before which the contest is being heard may, upon motion of any party to the contest, issue an order requiring that the voting equipment, ballots, and ballot boxes shall remain continuously locked for further time as may be reasonable or necessary, with due regard for the preparation of the voting equipment for a succeeding primary, regular election, or special election, but in no event shall the order compel that the voting equipment remain locked to a time within thirty (30) days next preceding any approaching primary, regular election, or special election.

During the period when the voting equipment and the ballot boxes are required to be kept locked, the keys thereto shall remain in the possession of the county board of elections. After that period, it shall be the duty of the county board of elections to return the keys to the custody of the county clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 43; 1992, ch. 288, § 37, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 129, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 176, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 197, § 37, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 219, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 129 eliminated the runoff primary in elections for Governor and Lieutenant Governor. In section 5 of that Act (this statute), a reference to “runoff primary” that was not deleted by the drafter has been deleted in codification as a manifest clerical or typographical error by the Reviser of Statutes.

117.305.
Recanvass of votes — Discrepancy or written request — Statistics sufficient to compel recanvass — Returns — Forms for reporting recanvassed vote — Administrative regulations for recanvass procedures.

The canvass and returns provided for in KRS

117.275

shall constitute the official returns of the precinct, unless before 4 p.m. on the Tuesday following a primary or regular election, or before 4 p.m. on the day following a special election held for the purpose of filling a vacancy, the county clerk or county board of elections takes notice of a discrepancy in the tally of votes cast in any precinct or number of precincts, or a candidate makes a written request to the county board of elections in the case of a candidate who has filed with the county clerk, or the Secretary of State in the case of a candidate who has filed with the Secretary of State, to check and recanvass the voting equipment, valid federal provisional ballots, valid federal provisional absentee ballots, and absentee ballots of any precinct or any number of precincts involving the candidate’s race. A candidate’s written request for a recanvass shall be insufficient to compel the recanvass unless the difference between the number of votes received by the requesting candidate and the number of votes received by any other candidate or candidates for the same office is less than one percent (1%) of the total votes which were cast for such office.

The county board of elections shall, immediately upon notice of any discrepancy as described in subsection (1) of this section, or upon receipt of a request for a recanvass, notify each candidate for the office of the time and place of the recanvass. At the recanvass, each political party represented on the board may appoint a representative there to be its governing body, and also each candidate to be voted for may be present, either in person or by a representative or both. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to observe the recanvass of the voting equipment in each precinct.

After the time period has elapsed and notice is taken as provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the county board of elections shall assemble at 9 a.m. on the Thursday following the filing deadline to request a recanvass under this section, and not sooner, and recheck and recanvass the voting equipment and make a proper return thereof to the county clerk, and the canvass and return shall become the official returns for the primary or election. In making the recanvass, the board shall make a record of the number of the seal or the unique designation upon the voting equipment and, without unlocking the voting equipment, recanvass the vote cast.

If, after a recanvass, it is found that the original canvass of the returns has been correctly made from the voting equipment, and that there still remains a discrepancy unaccounted for, this discrepancy shall be noted. If, upon recanvass, it appears that the original canvass of the returns by the election officers was incorrect, the returns and all papers being prepared by the board shall be corrected accordingly. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an individual from requesting, in addition to a recanvass, a recount as authorized by KRS Chapter 120.

The State Board of Elections shall prescribe and furnish the forms to be used by county boards of election to report all recanvassed votes. The form, promulgated through administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A, shall include the following information:

The name of the county in which the recanvass was conducted;

The date of the report;

The date of the primary or election;

The office for which the recanvass was conducted;

The names of each candidate for the office being recanvassed; and

The votes cast at the polls, absentee votes, valid federal provisional votes, valid federal provisional absentee votes, and vote totals for each candidate, as well as write-in votes cast in a regular or special election for candidates whose names did not appear on the ballot.

The report shall be signed by each member of the county board of elections.

The county board of elections shall file its recanvass report as prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elections in conformity with KRS Chapter 13A.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the proper procedures for conducting a recanvass for each type of voting system approved by the State Board of Elections and in use in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 44; 1976, ch. 130, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 250, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 394, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 470, § 16, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 51, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 421, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 494, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2020 ch. 89, § 21, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 38, effective June 29, 2021.